New York, session 2025-2026, A2597.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraph 4 of subsection (b) of section 800 of the tax 2 law, as added by section 1 of part YY of chapter 59 of the laws of 2015, 3 is amended to read as follows: 4 (4) Any eligible educational institution. An "eligible educational 5 institution" shall mean any public school district, a board of cooper- 6 ative educational services, a public elementary or secondary school, a 7 school approved pursuant to article eighty-five or eighty-nine of the 8 education law to serve students with disabilities of school age, [or] a 9 nonpublic elementary or secondary school that provides instruction in 10 grade one or above, or a community college, all public library systems 11 as defined in subdivision one of section two hundred seventy-two of the 12 education law, and all public and free association libraries as such 13 terms are defined in subdivision two of section two hundred fifty-three 14 of the education law. 15 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD05684-01-5